Utah statutes.
78B-15-408.   Fees for registry.
(1)  A fee may not be charged to remove a registration.
(2)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (3), the Office of Vital
Records may charge a reasonable fee for registering records pursuant to
Section 78B-15-401, making a search of the registry, and for furnishing a
certificate.
(3)  The Office of Recovery Services, the Office of the Attorney General, and
support-enforcement agencies of other states or tribes may not be required to
pay the fee authorized by Subsection (2).
